tables/ru-ru-g1.ctb
# liblouis: Russian literary (grade 1) text translation table
#
#-index-name: Russian, contracted
#-display-name: Russian contracted braille
#
#+language: ru
#+type: literary
#+dots: 6
#+contraction: partial
#+grade:1
#+direction: forward
#
#  Copyright (C) 2021 Ekaterina Anisimova <musicate@yandex.ru>
#  Copyright (C) 2021-2022 Andrey Yakuboy <braille@yakuboy.ru>
#  Copyright (C) 2025 Dmitriy Lazarev <dmitriy.braille.numeric674@aleeas.com>
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#Based on Zubkov M. - "Contracted braille. Grade 1" (Moscow, 1974)

# Contracted braille isn't used in Russia oficially, and not many people know it.
# This table was created to make contracted braille more popular.
# It may be not perfect because there're no data to test it.

attribute consonant бвгджзйклмнпрстфхцчшщъь
attribute vowel аеёиоуыэюя
attribute muffled кпстфхцчшщ
attribute voiced бвгджзлмнр
attribute shch бвгджзйклмнопрстфхцчшщъыьэюя

punctuation ( 6-126
punctuation ) 6-345
punctuation " 6-236
prepunc " 6-236
postpunc " 6-356
punctuation	\x00ab 6-236
punctuation	\x00bb 6-356
punctuation	\x2018 6-236			# 8216	smart single left quotation mark
punctuation	\x2019 6-356			# 8217	smart single right quotation mark
punctuation	\x201c 6-236		# 8220	smart opening double quote
punctuation	\x201d 6-356		# 8221	smart closing double quote
punctuation	\x201e 6-236		# 8222	smart double low quotation mark
punctuation	\x201f 6-356		# 8223	smart double high reverse quotation mark
punctuation	\x2039 6-236		# 8249	single Left-Pointing Angle Quotation Mark
punctuation	\x203a 6-356		# 8250	single Right-Pointing Angle Quotation Mark
punctuation \x203c 6-235-235		# 8252	double exclamation mark

# These rules override some rules coming from ru-litbrl.ctb.
# They aren't actual for the Russian contracted braille.

attribute dropspaceafter ,;\x00a7

noback correct $D[","$s] "\x2820,\s" # \x2820 is the braille dot 6
noback correct $d[","$s] "\x2820,\s"
noback correct $D[";"$s] "\x2820;\s"
noback correct $d[";"$s] "\x2820;\s"
noback correct [%dropspaceafter$s] *

# Workaround for not showing capitals
capsletter 9
begcapsword 9-9
endcapsword 9-9
noback pass2 @9 ?

include ru-litbrl.ctb

seqdelimiter -–—―−‐
seqbeforechars ([{"“'‘«
seqafterchars )]}"”'’».,;:!?…

# Table I

match (!(%[_>~]))+[вёзйклмнопрстучшщъыьэюя]+!(%_)+ ва - 3456
match - ва (!(%[_>~]))*[вёзйклмнопрстучшщъыьэюя]+ 3456
endword ва 3456
nofor partword ва 3456
begmidword ве 23456
begmidword вё 23456
always во 1236
sufword вы 3
partword го 12456
before shch partword де 1346
before shch partword дё 1346
before shch begmidword щ 6-1346
endword щ 6-1346
always до 256
always за 356
partword ка 346
midendword ки 246
midendword э 6-246
midendword Э 6-246
always ко 1456
partword ла 4
partword ле 26
partword лё 26
always ли 35
partword ло 456
always ль 2356
midword льн 2356
midword льне 2356-16
endword льно 2356-126
endword льна 2356-345
partword ме 146
partword мё 146
midendword ми 124
midendword ф 6-124
midendword Ф 6-124
always на 345
always не 16
partword нё 16
word ё 6-16
word Ё 6-16
always ни 34
always но 126
endword ны 46
always по 235
sufword при 12346
begword непри 16-12346
word й 6-12346
word Й 6-12346
after consonant midendword при 12346
sufword про 12356
word ъ 6-12356
word Ъ 6-12356
begword непро 16-12356
midendword ро 12356
partword ра 45
partword ре 2
partword рё 2
partword ри 5
sufword со 2346
word ы 6-2346
word Ы 6-2346
after vowel midendword со 2346
partword ст 25
before consonant match - ста ![р%_] 25
always та 123456
always те 23
partword ти 56
always то 13456
partword че 236
begmidword бъе 12-3-15
begmidword бъё 12-3-16
begmidword въе 2456-3-15
begmidword дъе 145-3-15
begmidword дъё 145-3-16
begmidword дъю 145-3-1256
begmidword зъя 1356-3-1246
begmidword нъе 1345-3-15
begmidword съе 234-3-15
begmidword съё 234-3-16
begmidword тъе 2345-3-15
begmidword тъё 2345-3-16
begmidword бье 12-3-15  
begmidword бьё 12-3-16  
begmidword бью 12-3-1256  
begmidword бья 12-3-1246  
begmidword вье 2456-3-15  
begmidword вьё 2456-3-16  
begmidword вью 2456-3-1256  
begmidword вья 2456-3-1246  
begmidword гье 1245-3-15  
begmidword гьё 1245-3-16  
begmidword гью 1245-3-1256  
begmidword гья 1245-3-1246  
begmidword дье 145-3-15  
begmidword дьё 145-3-16  
begmidword дью 145-3-1256  
begmidword дья 145-3-1246  
begmidword кье 13-3-15  
begmidword кьё 13-3-16  
begmidword кью 13-3-1256  
begmidword кья 13-3-1246
begmidword мье 134-3-15  
begmidword мьё 134-3-16  
begmidword мью 134-3-1256  
begmidword мья 134-3-1246  
begmidword нье 1345-3-15  
begmidword ньё 1345-3-16  
begmidword нью 1345-3-1256  
begmidword нья 1345-3-1246  
begmidword пье 1234-3-15  
begmidword пьё 1234-3-16  
begmidword пью 1234-3-1256  
begmidword пья 1234-3-1246  
begmidword рье 1235-3-15  
begmidword рьё 1235-3-16  
begmidword рью 1235-3-1256  
begmidword рья 1235-3-1246  
begmidword сье 234-3-15  
begmidword сьё 234-3-16  
begmidword сью 234-3-1256  
begmidword сья 234-3-1246  
begmidword тье 2345-3-15  
begmidword тьё 2345-3-16  
begmidword тью 2345-3-1256  
begmidword тья 2345-3-1246  
begmidword фье 124-3-15  
begmidword фьё 124-3-16  
begmidword фью 124-3-1256  
begmidword фья 124-3-1246  
begmidword хье 125-3-15  
begmidword хьё 125-3-16  
begmidword хью 125-3-1256  
begmidword хья 125-3-1246
midendword ьб 3-12
midendword ьв 3-2456
midendword ьг 3-1245
midendword ьд 3-145
midendword ьж 3-245
midendword ьз 3-1356
midendword ьк 3-13
midendword ьл 3-123
midendword ьм 3-134
midendword ьн 3-1345
midendword ьп 3-1234
midendword ьр 3-1235
midendword ьс 3-234
midendword ьт 3-2345
midendword ьф 3-124
midendword ьх 3-125
midendword ьц 3-14
endword бь 12-3
endword вь 2456-3
endword дь 145-3
endword зь 1356-3
endword мь 134-3
endword нь 1345-3
endword пь 1234-3
endword рь 1235-3

# Table II

word без 12-1356
before voiced before vowel begword без 12-1356
begmidword безъ 12-1356-3
before voiced before vowel begword небез 16-12-1356
before voiced before vowel begword безыз 12-1356-36
begmidword безызъ 12-1356-36-3
before voiced before vowel begword небезыз 16-12-1356-36
word бз 6-12-1356
before muffled begword бес 12-234
before muffled begword небес 16-12-234
word в\sзаключение 2456-0-356-15
word вместо 2456-13456
sufword внутри 2456-1235
word вр 6-2456-1235
word вопреки 1236-246
word в\sпродолжение 2456-0-12356-15
word вследствие 2456-26-15
word в\sтечение 2456-0-23-15
word для 145
word д 6-145
word Д 6-145
word из 36
before voiced before vowel begword из 36
begmidword изъ 36-3
before voiced before vowel  begword неиз 16-36
word кроме 13-146
sufword между 6-146
word около 135-135
word оо 6-135-135
sufword от 1256
begword неот 16-1256
begword безот 12-1356-1256
begword небезот 16-12-1356-1256
begword оте 135-23
begword ото 135-13456
sufword ю 6-1256
sufword Ю 6-1256
begword пере 46-1234
begword непере 16-46-1234
begword переиз 46-1234-36
begword непереиз 16-46-1234-36
begword переот 46-1234-1256
sufword пред 1234-145
begword непред 16-1234-145
begword предот 1234-145-1256
begword непредот 16-1234-145-1256
word пд 6-1234-145
before voiced before vowel begword предыз 1234-145-36
word предо 1234-256
word п. 6-1234-256
sufword прежде 1234-245
word пж 6-1234-245
word против 12356-2456
sufword напротив 345-12356-2456
sufword через 12345-1356
sufword чрез 12345-1356
word чз 6-12345-1356
begword черес 12345-234
word чс 6-12345-234

# Table III
